Mississippi statutes. Title 81. Banks and Financial Institutions
Article 6. Corporate Administration.

§ 81-14-251.
Membership of a mutual institution.

The membership of a mutual state savings bank shall consist of:

Any person who holds deposit accounts in a savings bank; or

Any person who borrows funds and becomes obligated on a loan from the savings bank, for such time as the loan remains unpaid, or the borrower remains liable to the savings bank for the payment thereof.

Any person in his own right, or in a trust or other fiduciary capacity, or any partnership, association, corporation, political subdivision or public or government unit or entity may become a member of a mutual savings bank. Members shall possess such voting rights and other rights as provided by a savings bank’s certificate of incorporation and bylaws. Such members shall be considered the owners of a mutual savings bank.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 64; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 66; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 66, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-253.
Directors.

The directors of a mutual savings bank shall be elected by the members at an annual meeting, held pursuant to the terms of Section 81-14-261, for such terms as the bylaws of the savings bank may provide. Director’s terms may be specified in the certificate of incorporation. Voting for directors by deposit account holders shall be weighted according to the total amount of deposit accounts held by such members, subject to any maximum number of votes per member which a savings bank may choose to prescribe in its bylaws. Voting rights for borrowers shall be as prescribed in the bylaws. Such requirements shall be fully prescribed in a detailed manner in the bylaws of the savings bank.

Each director of a state savings bank shall, in his own name, own capital stock in, or have a deposit relationship with the state savings bank on an unencumbered basis as follows:

For stock savings banks under Fifty Million Dollars ($50,000,000.00) in assets, stock ownership in the institution or its holding company of Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) in market value at time of purchase; or

For mutual savings banks under Fifty Million Dollars ($50,000,000.00) in assets, a Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollar ($2,500.00) deposit relationship; or

For stock savings banks over Fifty Million Dollars ($50,000,000.00) in assets, stock ownership in the institution or its holding company of Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) in market value at the time of purchase; or

For mutual savings banks over Fifty Million Dollars ($50,000,000.00) in assets, a Five Thousand Dollar ($5,000.00) deposit relationship. For savings banks that cross the Fifty Million Dollar ($50,000,000.00) threshold, the commissioner shall allow a reasonable period for the directors to comply with the ownership interest requirement.

Every state savings bank shall have no less than five (5) directors, two-thirds (2/3) of which shall be residents of this state. In addition, not more than two (2) of the directors may be members of the same immediate family, nor may there be more than one (1) director who is an attorney with a particular law firm.

A majority of the directors must not be salaried officers or employees of the savings bank or of any subsidiary or, except in the case of a savings bank having eighty percent (80%) or more of any class of voting shares owned by a holding company, any holding company affiliate thereof.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 65; Laws, 1996, ch. 400, § 36; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 67; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 67, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-255.
Conduct of directors and officers.

Directors and officers possess a fiduciary relationship with the savings bank which they serve, and shall not engage or participate, directly or indirectly, in any business or transaction conducted on behalf of or involving such savings bank, unless: (a) the business or transactions are conducted in good faith and are honest, fair and reasonable to the savings bank; (b) a full disclosure of the business or transaction and the nature of the director’s or officer’s interest is made to the board of directors; and (c) the business or transaction is approved in good faith by the board of directors with any interested director abstaining. The approval of the transaction shall be recorded in the minutes. Any profits inuring to the officer or director shall not be at the expense of the savings bank. The business or transaction shall not represent a breach of the officer’s or director’s fiduciary duty and shall not be fraudulent or illegal. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, the commissioner may require the disclosure by directors, officers and employees of their personal interest, directly or indirectly, in any business or transaction on behalf of or involving the savings bank and of their control of, or active participation in, enterprises having activities related to the business of the savings bank.

The following restrictions governing the conduct of directors and officers are specified, but that specification does not excuse those persons from the observance of any other aspect of the general fiduciary duty owed by them to the savings bank which they serve:

An officer or director of a mutual savings bank shall not hold office or status as a director or officer of another mutual savings bank subject to this chapter.

A director shall receive as remuneration only reasonable fees for services as a director or as a member of a committee of directors. A director who is also an officer or employee of the savings bank may receive compensation for service as an officer or employee.

A director or officer shall not have any interest, direct or indirect, in the purchase at less than its face value of any evidence of a savings account deposit or other indebtedness issued by the savings bank.

A savings bank, or director or officer thereof, shall not directly or indirectly require, as a condition to the granting of any loans or the extension of any other service by the savings bank or its affiliates, that the borrower or any other person undertake a contract of insurance or any other agreement or understanding with respect to the direct or indirect furnishing of any other goods or services with any specific company, agency or individual.

An officer or director acting as proxy for a member of a mutual savings bank shall not exercise, transfer or delegate that right in any consideration of a private benefit or advantage, direct or indirect, nor surrender control or pass his office to any other for any consideration of a private benefit or advantage, direct or indirect. The voting rights of members shall not be the subject of sale or similar transaction, either directly or indirectly. Any officer or director who violates the provisions of this paragraph shall be held accountable to the savings bank for an increment.

A director or officer shall not solicit, accept or agree to accept, directly or indirectly, from any person other than the savings bank any gratuity, compensation or other personal benefit for any action taken by the savings bank or for endeavoring to procure any action by the savings bank.

Subject to the approval of the commissioner, a savings bank’s bylaws may provide for reasonable indemnification to its officers, directors and employees in connection with the faithful performance of their duties for the savings bank. The commissioner may promulgate model indemnification provisions and may consider provisions available under applicable state and federal statutes.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 66; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 68; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 68, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-257.
Amendments to charter of incorporation and bylaws.

Any amendments to the charter of incorporation or bylaws of a savings bank shall be certified by the appropriate corporation official and submitted to the commissioner for his approval before they may become effective.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 67; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 69; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 69, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-259.
Voting rights.

Voting rights in the affairs of a state savings bank may be exercised by members and stockholders by voting either in person or by proxy. The commissioner shall promulgate rules and regulations governing forms of proxies, holders of proxies and proxy solicitation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 68; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 70; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 70, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-261.
Annual meetings notice required.

Each savings bank shall hold an annual meeting of its members or stockholders. The annual meeting shall be held at a time and place as provided in the bylaws or determined by the board of directors.

The board of directors of a mutual savings bank shall publish once a week for two (2) weeks preceding such meeting, in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where such savings bank has its principal office, a notice of the annual meeting. Such notice shall be signed by the savings bank’s secretary and shall state the time and place where it is to be held. In addition to the foregoing notice, each savings bank shall disseminate additional notice of any annual meeting to all members entering the premises of any office or branch of the savings bank in the regular course of business by posting therein, in full view of the public and such members, one or more conspicuous signs or placards announcing the time, date and place of the meeting and the availability of additional information. Printed matter shall be freely available to such members containing any information as prescribed in rules and regulations issued by the commissioner. Such additional notice shall be given at any time within the period of sixty (60) days prior to and fourteen (14) days prior to the meeting and shall continue through the time of the meeting.

The board of directors of a stock savings bank shall cause a written or printed notice signed by the savings bank’s secretary, and stating the time and place of the annual meeting to be delivered not less than ten (10) days nor more than fifty (50) days before the date of the meeting, either personally or by mail to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at the meeting. If mailed, such notice shall be deemed to be delivered when deposited in the United States Postal Service addressed to the stockholder at his address as it appears on the records of the corporation, with postage thereon prepaid.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 69; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 71; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 71, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-263.
Special meetings; notice required.

Special meetings of members or stockholders of a savings bank may be called by the president or the board of directors or by such other officers or persons as provided in the charter or bylaws of the savings bank. Notice of any special meeting of members or stockholders shall be given in the same manner as provided for annual meetings under Section 81-14-261.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 70; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 72; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 72, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-265.
Quorum.

Unless otherwise provided in the savings bank’s charter or bylaws, fifty (50) holders of deposit accounts in a mutual savings bank, or fifty (50) stockholders or a majority of shares eligible to vote in a stock savings bank, present in person or represented by proxy, shall constitute a quorum at any annual or special meeting.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 71; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 73; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 73, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-267.
Bonding.

A savings bank shall maintain a blanket indemnity bond of at least a minimum amount as prescribed by the commissioner.

A savings bank which employs collection agents, who for any reason are not covered by the bond as herein required, shall provide for the bonding of each agent in an amount equal to at least twice the average monthly collections of such agent. Such agents shall be required to make settlement with the institution at least once monthly. No such coverage by bond will be required of any agent which is an institution insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation. The amount and form of such bonds and the sufficiency of the surety thereon shall be approved by the board of directors and the commissioner before such bonds are valid. All such bonds shall provide that a cancellation thereof, either by the surety or by the insured, shall not become effective until thirty (30) days’ notice in writing has been given to the commissioner.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 72; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 74; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 74, eff from and after July 1, 2001.